test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-aqrlimi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - aʼrlimi: # adjectives 200 'eng /est haruline/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Nom: [aʼrlimi, arlimi]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Gen: [aʼrlimiz, arlimiz]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Par: [aʼrlimizt, arlimizt]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Dat: [aʼrlimizõn, arlimizõn]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Ins: [aʼrlimizõks, arlimizõks]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Ill: [aʼrlimizõ, arlimizõ]
     aʼrlimi+A+Sg+Ela: [aʼrlimizõst, arlimizõst]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Nom: [aʼrlimizt, arlimizt]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Gen: [aʼrlimizt, arlimizt]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Par: [aʼrlimiži, arlimiži]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Dat: [aʼrlimiztõn, arlimiztõn]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Ins: [aʼrlimiztõks, arlimiztõks]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Ill: [aʼrlimižiz, arlimižiz]
     aʼrlimi+A+Pl+Ela: [aʼrlimižist, arlimižist]
